Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-118
Police; arrest; power.

The police officers of a city of the second class shall have the power to arrest all offenders against the laws of the state or of the city, by day or by night, in the same manner as the county sheriff and to keep such offenders in the city prison, county jail, or other place of confinement to prevent their escape until trial can be had before the proper officer.

Laws 1879, § 19, p. 197;

R.S.1913, § 5010;

C.S.1922, § 4179;

C.S.1929, § 17-118;

R.S.1943, § 17-118;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 5;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 14.

Police officers are not provided with countywide jurisdiction pursuant to this statute. State v. Tingle, 239 Neb. 558, 477 N.W.2d 544 (1991).

A police officer of a city of the second class has the same powers as a sheriff or constable to arrest offenders against the laws of the state or city within his county. Henning v. City of Hebron, 186 Neb. 381, 183 N.W.2d 756 (1971).

Policemen of city of second class have all the powers of a sheriff or constable in making arrest. State v. Carpenter, 181 Neb. 639, 150 N.W.2d 129 (1967).